Utah statutes.
77-2a-1.   Definitions.
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1)  "Plea in abeyance" means an order by a court, upon motion of the
prosecution and the defendant, accepting a plea of guilty or of no contest
from the defendant but not, at that time, entering judgment of conviction
against him nor imposing sentence upon him on condition that he comply with
specific conditions as set forth in a plea in abeyance agreement.
(2)  "Plea in abeyance agreement" means an agreement entered into between the
prosecution and the defendant setting forth the specific terms and conditions
upon which, following acceptance of the agreement by the court, a plea may be
held in abeyance.
